California statutes. Public Resources Code
 complies with the California Building Code. Surface fuels, slash, and woody debris within 150 feet from any point of an approved and legally permitted structure that complies with the California Building Code shall be chipped, burned, or removed.

(e) Timber operations shall comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and (6) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 1038 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) All timber operations conducted in Lake Tahoe Region must have a valid Tahoe Basin Tree Removal Permit, as defined by the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency (TRPA), or shall be conducted under a valid TRPA Memorandum of Understanding, when such a permit is required by TRPA.

(g) The submitted notice of exemption shall include selection criteria for the trees to be
 harvested or the trees to be retained.

(h) The department shall provide the appropriate regional water quality control board, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the California
 Geological Survey with copies of notices of exemption when they are submitted.

(i) The submitted notice of exemption shall include the tentative commencement date of timber operations.

(j) Within a 15-day period, the registered professional forester responsible for the submittal of the notice of exemption shall notify the department, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the appropriate regional water quality control board, and the California Geological Survey of the actual date of commencement of timber operations.

(k) Operations pursuant to an exemption may not commence for 10
 working days from the date of the director’s receipt of the notice of exemption unless this delay is waived by the director. The director shall determine whether the notice of exemption is complete, and if so, shall send a copy of a notice of acceptance to the submitter. If the notice of exemption is not complete and accurate, it shall be returned to the submitter and the timber operator may not proceed. If the director does not act within five days of receipt of the notice of exemption, timber operations may commence.

(l) (1) No Decadent and Deformed Trees with Value to Wildlife, as defined in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be harvested unless all the following apply:

(A) The tree is not critical for the maintenance of a Late Successional Stand.

(B) A
 registered professional forester attached to the submitted notice of exemption a written explanation and justification for the harvest of the tree based on the registered professional forester’s finding of any of the following:

(i) The tree is a hazard to safety or property.

(ii) The removal of the tree is necessary for the construction of a building as approved by the appropriate local jurisdiction and shown on the county or city approved site plan which shall be attached to the submitted notice of exemption.

(iii) The tree is dead or likely to die within one year of the date of the proposed removal, as determined by a registered professional forester.

(2) A registered professional forester’s written explanation or justification need not be attached to
 the submitted notice of exemption if an approved Habitat Conservation Plan, Sustained Yield Plan, or plan as that term is defined in Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations addresses large old tree retention for the area in which the large old tree is proposed for removal and the removal is in compliance with the retention standards of that document.

(3) Any tree harvested pursuant to this subdivision shall be shown on a map provided with the submitted notice of exemption to the department.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to or be used in conjunction with the Forest Resilience Exemption created pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 4584.

(m) Helicopter yarding shall be prohibited.

(n) All applicable provisions of the
 Professional Foresters Law, including, but not limited to, Sections 775 to 779, inclusive, of this code, as well as all applicable provisions of Registration of Professional Forester Rules, including, but not limited to, Sections 1612 to 1614, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations apply to the practice of professional forestry as it relates to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 19.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4584.5.

Nothing in Section 4584 shall exempt the owner of any timber harvested from registering with the State Board of Equalization or from the payment of any applicable timber yield taxes imposed pursuant to Section 38115 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 746, Sec. 3.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4585.

(a) Within one month after completion of the work described in the timber harvesting plan or nonindustrial timber harvest notice, excluding work for stocking, site preparation, or maintenance of drainage facilities and soil stabilization treatments on skid trails, roads, and landings after the plan period, a report shall be filed by the timber owner or the owner’s agent with the department that all work, except stocking, site preparation, or maintenance of drainage facilities and soil stabilization treatments, has been completed.

(b) If all of the work described in the plan has not been completed, a report may be filed annually with respect to a portion of the area covered by the plan which has been completed. The portion completed shall be adequately identified on a map submitted with the report.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 3) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4586.

Within six months of the receipt of the work completion report specified in Section 4585, the director shall determine, by inspection, whether the work described in the report has been properly completed in conformity with the rules and regulations of the board and the standards of this chapter. If the work has been so completed, the director shall issue a report of satisfactory completion of the work. If not, the director shall take corrective action as the director determines to be appropriate in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 4601).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 82.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4587.

(a) Within five years after completion of timber operations on an area identified in a report submitted pursuant to Section 4585 or nonindustrial timber harvest notice, a report of stocking with respect to that area shall be filed by the timber owner or the owner’s agent with the department. A separate report of stocking may be filed with the work completion report for those areas which meet stocking requirements upon completion of timber operations. The board, by regulation, shall establish one or more statistically valid standardized sampling procedures designed to measure the number of trees and their dispersion.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the board shall adopt regulations which specify the conditions and manner in which the necessity of employing sampling procedures may be waived. The regulations shall provide that, in addition to any other possible conditions which may be required by the board, the standard sampling procedures may be waived only if the director or the director’s representative and the timber owner, or a registered professional forester acting as the owner’s agent, agree that the area is adequately stocked to meet the standards of this chapter and any applicable rules or regulations of the board. The regulations shall require that, if the director or the director’s representative does not agree that the area is so stocked, a standardized sample shall be required.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 7) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 706, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4588.

Within six months of the receipt of the stocking report, the director shall determine, by inspection, whether the stocking has been properly completed. If the stocking is properly completed, the director shall issue a report of satisfactory completion of stocking. If the stocking is not properly completed, the director shall take corrective action as the director deems appropriate in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 4601) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 83.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4589.

(a) The department and board, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, and the State Water Resources Control Board, shall, commencing December 31, 2019, and annually thereafter, review and submit a report to the Legislature on the trends in the use of, compliance with, and effectiveness of, the exemptions and emergency notice provisions described in Sections 4584 and 4592 of this code and Sections 1038 and 1052 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations. The report shall include an analysis of exemption use and whether the exemptions are having the intended effect. The report shall also include recommendations to improve the use of those exemptions and emergency notice provisions, information on the linear distance of road constructed or reconstructed under notices of exemption by individual ownerships,
 within a representative sample of planning watersheds from each forest practice district as defined in Sections 907 to 909, inclusive, of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, and violations associated with road reconstruction. The report shall include information on the number and type of violations and enforcement actions taken on each notice of exemption and emergency notice. The report shall also contain the number of posttreatment onsite inspections that occur and whether those inspections were attended by a representative of the Department of Fish and Wildlife and a representative of the State Water Resources Control Board. The report submitted on December 31, 2025, shall include recommendations necessary for revisions to diameter limits at stump heights of harvestable trees under subdivisions (j) and (k) of Section 4584, as those subdivisions read on January 1, 2024.

(b) The public shall be provided opportunities to participate
 in the review and the development of the report.

(c) The report shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) (A) This section shall be operative for a period of five years after the effective date of emergency regulations as adopted by the board and as of that date is inoperative.

(B) The board shall notify the Secretary of State when emergency regulations have been adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 388, Sec. 4.   (AB 2276)   Effective January 1, 2025.       Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4590.

(a) (1) A timber harvesting plan approved by the department on or after July 1, 2012, is effective for a period of not more than five years, unless extended pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) A timber harvesting plan, pursuant to which timber operations have commenced, but have not been completed, may be extended by amendment for two years in order to complete the timber operations, if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) Good cause is shown.

(B) All timber operations are in conformance with the timber harvesting plan, this chapter, and all applicable rules and regulations, upon the filing of the notice of
 extension as required by this section.

(b) The extension shall apply to any area covered by the timber harvesting plan for which a report has not been submitted under Section 4585. The notice of extension shall be provided to the department not sooner than 140 days, but at least 10 days, prior to the expiration date of the timber harvesting plan. The notice shall include the circumstances that prevented a timely completion of the timber operations under the timber harvesting plan and, consistent with Section 4583, an agreement to comply with this chapter and the rules and regulations of the board as these exist on the date the extension notice is filed.

(c) Stocking work may continue for more than the effective period of a timber harvesting plan under subdivision (a), but shall be completed within five years after the conclusion of other work.

(d) In addition to the extension authorized by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a timber harvesting plan that is approved by the department from January 1, 2014, to December 31, 2015, inclusive, may be extended by amendment for an additional two years in order to complete the timber operations, if the timber harvesting plan complies with subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) and the notice of extension, pursuant to subdivision (b), includes written certification by a registered professional forester that neither of the conditions in subdivision (e) has occurred.

(e) The department shall not approve an extension of a timber harvesting plan pursuant to subdivision (a) or (d) if either of the following has occurred:

(1) Listed species, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 2050) of
 Chapter 1.5 of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code or the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), have been discovered in the logging area of the timber harvesting plan since approval of the plan.

(2) Significant physical changes to the harvest area or adjacent areas have occurred since the timber harvesting plan’s cumulative impacts were originally assessed.

(f) An extension of a timber harvesting plan for which either of the conditions in subdivision (e) has occurred may be obtained only pursuant to Section 1039 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 734, Sec. 1.   (SB 709)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4591.

Amendments to the original timber harvesting plan may be submitted detailing proposed changes from the original plan. Substantial deviations from the original plan shall not be undertaken until the amendment has been filed with, and acted upon, by the department in accordance with Sections 4582.7 and 4583. An amendment may not extend the effective period of the plan, except as provided in Section 4590.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 915) by Stats. 1993, Ch. 706, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4591.1.

The board shall specify by regulation those deviations which may be undertaken by an operator without submission of an amended plan but which must subsequently be reported to the department, and provide for the manner of so reporting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4592.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a registered professional forester may in an emergency, on behalf of a timber owner or operator, file an “emergency notice” with the department that shall allow immediate commencement of timber operations. The emergency notice shall include a declaration, under penalty of perjury, that a bona fide emergency exists which requires immediate harvest activities, and that any applicable timber yield taxes will be paid pursuant to Section 38115 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. Those emergencies shall be defined by the board and may include, but are not limited to, the necessity to harvest to remove fire-killed or damaged timber or insect or disease-infested timber, or to undertake emergency repairs to roads.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 746, Sec. 4.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4592.5.

(a) The department shall provide guidance and assistance to ensure the uniform and efficient implementation of processes and procedures regulating the filing, review, approval, required modification, and completion of timber harvesting plans, and the appeal of decisions relating to timber harvesting plans. The guidance and assistance shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) A plan submitter has the expectation of a timely determination under Section 4582.7 and any relevant administrative regulations.

(2) The department shall provide clearly written guidance documents that explain the regulatory process. In this context, the department shall publish a list of all information required in
 a plan, using the rules of the board, and an explanation of the criteria that will be used by the department to determine whether the information contained in a plan at the time of submission is adequate.

(3) The department, using the rules of the board, shall provide a checklist that, if properly followed by the registered professional forester, should result in a plan that complies with Section 4582 for the purposes of filing. The department, in the implementation of an electronic plan submission program, shall incorporate procedures that address this information.

(b) In addition to the requirements in subdivision (a), the department shall issue guidance to achieve greater timber harvesting plan review accuracy and efficiency and to avoid duplication of efforts. The guidance shall include guidance to responsible agencies that rely on the timber harvesting plan for their analysis
 under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) when the agencies are issuing a permit to enable implementation of all or part of the project. This guidance shall assist the responsible agencies to avoid duplication in information requests for the responsible agencies’ permits. Responsible agencies are encouraged to include mitigation measures prior to the close of public comment to ensure they are examined at a sufficient level of detail prior to the close of public comment.

(c) This section does not preclude the department or other public agencies from imposing postapproval compliance requirements as the result of newly discovered or unforeseen conditions.

(d) For purposes of this section, “plan” or “timber harvesting plan” includes all forms or documents required to be submitted to the department for review, including, but not
 limited to, timber harvesting plan documents, program timberland environmental impact reports, program timber harvesting plans, modified timber harvesting plans, nonindustrial timber management plans, sustained yield plans, and working forest management plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 237.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Nonindustrial Timber Management Plan [4593. - 4594.7.]

4593.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a substantial acreage of timberlands of the state are held by private nonindustrial owners and that it is the policy of the state to increase the productivity of these timberlands under prudent management plans to serve the public’s need for timber and other forest products.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that minimal environmental harm is caused by prudent management of nonindustrial timberlands because low volume production and dispersion around the state of these small tracts reduces damage to aesthetics, air quality, watersheds, and wildlife.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that it is the policy of the state to encourage prudent and responsible forest resource management of nonindustrial timberlands by approving nonindustrial timber management plans in advance and withdrawing governmental discretion to disapprove nonindustrial timber harvest notices submitted pursuant to the approved nonindustrial timber management plans.

(d) It is not the intent of the Legislature by the enactment of this article to limit the penalties and enforcement provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.2.

Notwithstanding Section 4521, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern construction of this article:

(a) “Nonindustrial timberlands” means timberland owned by a nonindustrial tree farmer.

(b) “Nonindustrial tree farmer” means an owner of timberland with less than 2,500 acres who has an approved nonindustrial management plan and is not primarily engaged in the manufacture of forest products.

(c) “Uneven aged management” means the management of a specific forest, with the goal of establishing a well stocked stand of various age classes and which permits the periodic harvest of individual or
 small groups of trees to realize the yield and continually establish a new crop.

(d) “Sustained yield” means the yield of commercial wood that an area of commercial timberland can produce continuously at a given intensity of management consistent with required environmental protection and which is professionally planned to achieve over time a balance between growth and removal.

(e) “Nonindustrial timber management plan” means a management plan for nonindustrial timberlands with an objective of an uneven aged managed timber stand and sustained yield for each parcel or group of contiguous parcels meeting the requirements of Section 4593.3. A nonindustrial timber management plan may include multiple nonindustrial tree farmers, but shall not cover more than 2,500 acres.

(f) “Nonindustrial timber harvest notice” means
 notice of timber harvest operations pursuant to an approved nonindustrial timber management plan and meeting the requirements of Section 4594.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 17.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.3.

A nonindustrial timber management plan may be filed with the department in writing by a person who intends to become a nonindustrial tree farmer with the long-term objective of an uneven aged timber stand and sustained yield through the implementation of a nonindustrial timber management plan. The nonindustrial timber management plan shall be prepared by a registered professional forester. It shall be a public record and shall include all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the timberland owner.

(b) A description of the land on which the nonindustrial timber management plan is
 proposed to be implemented, including a United States Geological Survey quadrangle map or equivalent indicating the location of all streams, the location of all proposed and existing logging truck roads, and indicating boundaries of all site I classification timberlands to be stocked in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 4561 and any other site classifications if the board establishes specific minimum stocking standards for other site classifications.

(c) A description of the silviculture methods to be applied and the type of yarding equipment to be used.

(d) An outline of the methods to be used to avoid excessive accelerated erosion from timber operations to be conducted within the proximity of a stream.

(e) Special provisions, if any, to protect any unique area within the boundaries of the proposed nonindustrial timber management plan.

(f) A description of the existing stand, its current projected growth, alterations required to achieve the management objectives, the projected timber volumes and tree sizes to be available for harvest, and projected frequencies of harvest.

(g) A certification by the registered professional forester preparing the nonindustrial timber management plan that the registered professional forester or a designee has personally inspected the plan area.

(h) Any other information the board provides by regulation to meet its rules and the standards of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 84.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.4.

The board shall adopt regulations regarding the notice of receipt of the proposed nonindustrial timber management plan. The notice shall be given within two working days following submission of the proposed management plan and shall be consistent with Horn v. County of Ventura, 24 Cal. 3d 605, and all applicable laws. In adopting the regulations, the board shall take account of the extent of the administrative burden involved in giving the notice. The method of notice shall include, but not be limited to, mailed notice. The regulations may require the person submitting the nonindustrial timber management plan to provide to the department a list of the names and addresses of persons to whom the notice is to be mailed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.5.

The department shall provide notice of the filing of nonindustrial timber management plans to any person who requests, in writing, that notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.6.

Upon receipt of the nonindustrial timber management plan, the department shall place it, or a true copy thereof, in a file available for public inspection in the county in which timber operations are proposed under the plan, and, for the purpose of interdisciplinary review, shall transmit a copy to the Department of Fish and Game, the appropriate California regional water quality control board, the county planning agency, and all other agencies having jurisdiction by law over natural resources affected by the plan. The department shall invite, consider, and respond in writing to comments received from public agencies to which the plan has been transmitted and shall consult with those agencies at their request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.7.

(a) The director has 45 days from the date the initial inspection is completed as provided in Section 4604, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the director and the person submitting the nonindustrial timber management plan, to review the plan to determine if the plan is in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and this chapter. If the director determines that the plan is not in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board or this chapter, the director shall return the plan, stating his or her reasons and advising the person submitting the plan of the person’s right to a hearing before the board.

(b) If the director does not act within the time periods provided in subdivision (a), a longer period shall be negotiated and mutually agreed upon by the director and the person submitting the nonindustrial timber management plan. If a longer period cannot be mutually agreed upon, the nonindustrial timber management plan shall be deemed denied and returned to the person submitting the plan.

(c) A person to whom a plan is returned may, within 10 days from the receipt of the plan, request the board for a public hearing before the board. The board shall schedule a public hearing to review the plan to determine if the plan is in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and this chapter. Board action shall take place within 30 days from the filing of the appeal, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the board and the person filing the appeal. If the plan is not approved on appeal to the board, the director, within 10 days of board action, may determine that the plan is in conformance if the plan is revised to bring it into full conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.8.

The nonindustrial tree farmer may submit a proposed amendment to the approved plan and may not take any action which substantially deviates, as defined by the board, from the approved plan until the amendment has been filed with the director and the director has determined that the amendment is in compliance with the rules and regulations of the board and the provisions of this chapter which were in effect at the time the nonindustrial timber management plan was approved, in accordance with the same procedures specified in Section 4593.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.9.

The nonindustrial tree farmer may take actions which do not substantially deviate from the approved plan without the submittal of an amendment, but those actions shall be subsequently reported to the department. The board shall specify, by regulation, those nonsubstantial deviations which may be taken. The board shall specify the requirements for reporting those deviations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.10.

(a) Upon a change of ownership of the land described in the nonindustrial timber management plan, the transferring landowner shall provide the acquiring landowner with written notice that discloses the existence of the plan and informs the acquiring landowner of the need to notify the department if the acquiring landowner intends to assume the plan. The transferring landowner shall also send the department a copy of the notice provided to the acquiring landowner.

(b) If the transferring landowner fails to provide the notice required in subdivision (a) and the department discovers the change of ownership, the department shall provide the acquiring
 landowner with the notice described in subdivision (a).

(c) The acquiring landowner shall have one year from the date of the receipt of the notice required pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), whichever is applicable, to notify the department in writing of his or her assumption of the plan. If the department does not receive notification within this period, the department may cancel the plan.

(d) A violation of this section by a landowner does not constitute a crime pursuant to Section 4601.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 291, Sec. 1.   (AB 2239)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4593.11.

The nonindustrial tree farmer may cancel the nonindustrial timber management plan by submitting a written notice to the department. Once timber operations have commenced pursuant to a nonindustrial timber harvest notice, cancellation is not effective on land covered by the notice until a report of satisfactory completion has been issued pursuant to Sections 4585, 4586, and 4587.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4594.

The nonindustrial tree farmer who owns, leases, or otherwise controls or operates on all or any portion of any timberland within the boundaries of an approved nonindustrial timber management plan, and who plans to harvest any of the timber thereon during a given year, shall file a nonindustrial timber harvest notice with the department in writing. A notice shall be filed prior to the harvesting of any timber and shall be effective for a maximum of one year from the date of filing. If the person who files the notice is not the owner of the timberland, the person filing the notice shall notify the timberland owner by certified mail that the notice has been submitted, and shall certify that mailing to the department. The notice shall be a public record and shall include all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the timber owner.

(b) The name and address of the timber operator.

(c) The name and address of the registered professional forester preparing the nonindustrial timber harvest notice.

(d) A description of the land on which the work is proposed to be done.

(e) A statement that no archeological sites have been discovered in the harvest area since the approval of the nonindustrial timber management plan.

(f) A statement that no rare, threatened, or endangered plant or animal species has been discovered in the harvest area since the approval of the nonindustrial timber management plan.

(g) A statement that there have been no physical environmental changes in the harvest area that are so significant as to require any amendment of the nonindustrial timber management plan.

(h) A certification by the registered professional forester that the notice as carried out will implement best management practices for protection of the beneficial uses of water, soil stability, forest productivity, and wildlife as required by the current rules of the board, or a certification that practices consistent with the original plan will not result in any significant degradation to the beneficial uses of water, soil stability, forest productivity, or wildlife.

(i) Special provisions, if any, to protect any unique area within the area of timber operations.

(j) The expected dates of commencement and completion of timber operations during the year.

(k) A statement that the harvesting notice conforms to the provisions of the approved management plan.

(l) Any other information the board provides by regulation to meet its rules and the standards of this chapter.

(m) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1996.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 756, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative January 1, 1996, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4594.2.

The registered professional forester who prepares the nonindustrial timber management plan or prepares the notice, or any other registered professional forester who is employed by the owner or operator, shall report to the owner or operator if there are deviations from the plan which, in his or her judgment, threaten the attainment of the resource conservation standards of the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4594.4.

If the board finds that a registered professional forester has made any material misstatement in any nonindustrial timber harvesting notice, nonindustrial timber management plan, or report under this chapter, the board shall take disciplinary action against that registered professional forester as provided under Section 775.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 85.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4594.6.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if a registered professional forester certifies by written declaration, on behalf of the timber owner or operator, that the nonindustrial timber harvesting notice conforms to, and meets the requirements of, the approved nonindustrial timber management plan under which it is filed, timber operations may commence immediately unless the notice has been filed by mailing, in which case operations may commence three days after the notice has been mailed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------

4594.7.

If it is determined that the objectives of uneven aged management and sustained yield are not being met by a nonindustrial tree farmer, or there are other persistent violations detected that are not being corrected, a previously approved nonindustrial timber management plan shall be canceled by the department and any further timber operations under the plan shall be terminated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1290, Sec. 9.   Operative January 1, 1991, or sooner, by Sec. 18 of Ch. 1290.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.7. Working Forest Management Plan [4597. - 4597.22.]

4597.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The nonindustrial timber management plan established pursuant to Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 4593) has been successful in meeting the intent of this chapter by encouraging prudent and responsible forest management and discouraging accelerated timberland conversion by private nonindustrial forest landowners.

(2) There have been more than 850 nonindustrial timber management plans approved by the department covering a combined area of more than 360,000 acres.

(3) Building upon the model provided by the nonindustrial timber management plan, it is the policy of the state
 to encourage long-term planning, increased productivity of timberland, and the conservation of open space on a greater number of nonindustrial working forest ownerships and acreages.

(4) It is the policy of the state to encourage prudent and responsible forest resource management of nonindustrial timberlands by approving working forest management plans in advance and authorizing working forest timber harvest notices to be filed ministerially.

(5) To ensure long-term benefits such as added carbon sequestration, local and regional employment and economic activity, sustainable production of timber and other forest products, aesthetics, and the maintenance of ecosystem processes and services, the working forest management plan shall comply with rigorous timber inventory standards that are subject to periodic review and verification.

(b) This article shall be implemented in a manner that complies with the applicable provisions of this chapter and other laws, including, but not limited to, the Timberland Productivity Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51100) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), the Porter Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code), and the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of the Fish and Game Code). Working forest landowners, as defined in Section 4597.1, shall comply with all applicable regulatory requirements of the State Water Resources Control Board and the appropriate regional water quality control board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 18.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4597.1.

Notwithstanding Section 4521, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions govern construction of this article:

(a) “Long-term sustained yield” means the average annual growth sustainable by the inventory predicted at the end of a 100-year planning horizon, or a shorter planning horizon if the forest encompassed by the working forest management plan has reached a balance between growth and yield.

(b) “Major stand type” means a stand that occupies an area equal to or greater than 25 percent of a working forest management plan.

(c) “Management unit” means a geographically identifiable area delineated for silviculture or management purposes.
 A management unit is intended to reflect an area scheduled for harvest under the plan in any given year, but may also be designated to address specific resource sensitivities.
